Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Article 4. Arson, Criminal Mischief, and Related Offenses.

Collateral references. —

5 Am. Jur. 2d, Arson and Related Offenses, § 1 et seq.

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Malicious Mischief and Related Offenses, § 1 et seq.

6A C.J.S., Arson, § 1 et seq.

54 C.J.S., Malicious or Criminal Mischief, § 1 et seq.

Vacancy or nonoccupancy of building as affecting its character as “dwelling” as regards arson, 44 ALR2d 1456.

Burning of building by mortgagor as burning property of another so as to constitute arson, 76 ALR2d 524.

Single act affecting multiple victims as constituting multiple assaults or homicides, 8 ALR4th 960.

What constitutes “burning” to justify charge of arson,
28 ALR4th 482.

Pyromania and the criminal law,
51 ALR4th 1243.

Liability for spread of fire intentionally set for legitimate purpose, 25 ALR5th 391.

Sec. 11.46.400.
Arson in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of arson in the first degree if the person intentionally damages any property by starting a fire or causing an explosion and by that act recklessly places another person in danger of serious physical injury. For purposes of this section, “another person” includes but is not limited to fire and police service personnel or other public employees who respond to emergencies, regardless of rank, functions, or duties being performed.

Arson in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1983)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Legislative history reports. —

For Senate letter of intent relating to ch. 39, SLA 1983, see 1983 Senate Journal, pp. 106 and 171; for House letter of intent on that Act, see 1983 House Journal, p. 1250; see also 1983 House Journal, p. 1699.

Sec. 11.46.410.
Arson in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of arson in the second degree if the person knowingly damages a building by starting a fire or causing an explosion.

In a prosecution under this section, it is an affirmative defense

that no person other than the defendant had a possessory, proprietary, or security interest in the building or that all persons having such an interest consented to the defendant’s conduct; and

that the sole intent of the defendant was to damage or destroy the building for a lawful purpose.

Arson in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 14 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

Definitions of “property,” “serious physical injury,” “building,” “affirmative defense” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Criminal mischief - AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Criminal possession of explosives - AS

11.61.240

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.010

; 11.20.020; AS 11.20.030; AS 11.20.040; AS 11.20.060; AS 11.20.070.

TD: III, 69-73.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 14, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending (a) of this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 11.46.420.
Arson in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of arson in the third degree if the person intentionally damages a motor vehicle

by starting a fire or causing an explosion while that vehicle is located on public land; or

that is the property of another person by starting a fire or causing an explosion while that vehicle is located on private property.

Arson in the third degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 1 ch 68 SLA 2008; am § 16 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(11), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), redesignated a portion of (a) as (a)(1); in (a)(1), substituted “public” for “state or municipal” and made a related change; added (a)(2).

Sec. 11.46.427.
Criminally negligent burning in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of criminally negligent burning in the first degree if the person

violates AS

11.46.430

; and

within the preceding 10 years, has been convicted on two separate occasions of violating

AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.430

;

misdemeanor crimes under AS

41.15.060

—

41.15.120

; or

a law or ordinance of this or another jurisdiction with elements similar to the offenses in (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

Criminally negligent burning in the first degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 15 ch 75 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, added (a)(2)(B), and in (a)(2)(C), deleted “AS

41.15.150

or” at the beginning, and substituted “similar to the offenses in (A) or (B) of this paragraph” for “similar to those offenses”. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Editor's notes. —

Section 43(a), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides this section “[applies] to an offense occurring and on or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 15, ch. 75, SLA 2008, enacting this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 11.46.430.
Criminally negligent burning in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of criminally negligent burning in the second degree if with criminal negligence the person damages property of another by fire or explosion.

Criminally negligent burning in the second degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 16 ch 75 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “property of another” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “criminal negligence” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Arson in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.400

,

11.46.410

Original Code Provision - AS 11.15.340

TD: III, 73-74.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 43(a), ch. 75, SLA 2008 provides that the 2008 amendment of this section “[applies] to an offense occurring on or after July 1, 2008.”

Section 44, ch. 75, SLA 2008, explicitly declares § 16, ch. 75, SLA 2008, amending this section, is subject to severability as authorized by AS

01.10.030

.

Sec. 11.46.450.
Failure to control or report a dangerous fire.

A person commits the crime of failure to control or report a dangerous fire if the person knows that a fire is endangering life or a substantial amount of property of another and fails to take reasonable measures to put out or control the fire, when the person can do so without substantial personal risk, or to give a prompt fire alarm if

the person knows that the person is under an official, contractual, or other legal duty to prevent or combat the fire; or

the fire was started by the person, with the person’s consent, or on property in the person’s custody or control.

Failure to control or report a dangerous fire is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “knowingly” -
AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “property of another” - AS

11.46.990

(13)

Arson in the first and second degree - AS

11.46.400

,

11.46.410

Criminally negligent burning - AS

11.46.430

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.46.460.
Disregard of a highway obstruction.

A person commits the offense of disregard of a highway obstruction if, without the right to do so or a reasonable ground to believe the person has the right, the person

drives a vehicle through, over, or around an obstruction erected on a highway under authority of AS

19.10.100

; or

opens an obstruction erected on a highway under authority of AS

19.10.100

.

Violation of this section is a violation punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 36 SLA 2016)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to this section, see sec. 185(a)(12), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a), substituted “offense” for “crime” and made minor stylistic changes; in (b), substituted “violation punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000'” for “Class B misdemeanor”.

Sec. 11.46.462.
Unlawful possession of official traffic control device.

A person commits the offense of unlawful possession of an official traffic control device if, without the right to do so or a reasonable ground to believe the person has the right, the person possesses an official traffic control device.

Unlawful possession of an official traffic control device is a violation and is punishable by a fine of

not less than $100 for the first offense; or

not less than $300 for each subsequent offense.

History.

(§ 1 ch 52 SLA 1988; am § 13 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

Definitions of “highway”, “official traffic control device”, “traffic control device” - AS

11.46.490

Forfeiture of property upon conviction - AS

11.46.487

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Sec. 11.46.475.
Criminal mischief in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal mischief in the first degree if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right,

the person intentionally damages an oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility;

with intent to cause a substantial interruption or impairment of a service rendered to the public by a utility or by an organization that deals with emergencies involving danger to life or property, the person damages or tampers with property of that utility or organization and causes substantial interruption or impairment of service to the public;

with intent to damage property of another by the use of widely dangerous means, the person damages property of another in an amount exceeding $100,000 by the use of widely dangerous means.

Criminal mischief in the first degree is a class A felony.

History.

(§ 5 ch 92 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A felonies, see AS

12.55.125(c)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 21, ch. 92, SLA 2002 provides that this section “applies to offenses committed on or after June 28, 2002.”

Sec. 11.46.480.
Criminal mischief in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal mischief in the second degree if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right,

the person tampers with an oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility or an airplane or helicopter, with reckless disregard for the risk of harm to or loss of the property; or

with intent to cause physical injury to another person, the person

tampers with food, air, water, or an item that is a drug or cosmetic, or a container for food, air, water, or the item; or

delivers, dispenses, or distributes food, air, water, or an item described in (A) of this paragraph knowing that a person has tampered with the food, air, water, or item or a container for the food, air, water, or item.

In (a)(2) of this section,

“deliver” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of food, air, water, or an item;

“dispense” means to deliver a drug to an ultimate user or research subject by or under the lawful order of a practitioner, including the prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the drug for that delivery;

“distribute” means to deliver food, air, water, or an item, whether or not there is any money or other item of value exchanged; it includes sale, gift, or exchange;

“drug” has the meaning given in AS

11.71.900

;

[Repealed, § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003.]

Criminal mischief in the second degree is a class B felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 3 SLA 1984; am §§ 6 — 8 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 74 ch 35 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

Definition of “oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility,” “tamper,” “utility,” “widely dangerous means” - AS

11.46.490

Definition of “intentionally” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “organization,” “property” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Original Code Provision - AS 11.20.517.

TD: IV, 21-22.

For punishment of class B felonies, see AS

12.55.125(d)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For liability for destruction of property by minors, see AS

09.65.255

.

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes were made in the section in 1984. Subsection (b) was formerly (c) and subsection (c) was formerly (b); relettered in 2002. In 2018, “AS

11.71.900

” was substituted for “AS

11.71.900

(9)” to reflect the renumbering in that section.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 21, ch. 92, SLA 2002 provides that the 2002 amendments to this section apply “to offenses committed on or after June 28, 2002.”

Sec. 11.46.482.
Criminal mischief in the third degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal mischief in the third degree if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right,

with intent to damage property of another, the person damages property of another in an amount of $750 or more;

the person recklessly creates a risk of damage in an amount exceeding $100,000 to property of another by the use of widely dangerous means; or

the person knowingly

defaces, damages, or desecrates a cemetery or the contents of a cemetery or a tomb, grave, or memorial regardless of whether the tomb, grave, or memorial is in a cemetery or whether the cemetery, tomb, grave, or memorial appears to be abandoned, lost, or neglected;

removes human remains or associated burial artifacts from a cemetery, tomb, grave, or memorial regardless of whether the cemetery, tomb, grave, or memorial appears to be abandoned, lost, or neglected.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under (a)(3) of this section that the defendant, at the time of the offense, was

an employee of the cemetery and was engaged in an authorized activity on behalf of the cemetery; or

authorized by law or state permit to engage in the conduct.

In this section,

“contents of a cemetery” includes anything that is designed or used for the protection, security, or ornamentation of a cemetery and that is located within a cemetery;

“memorial” means a headstone, marker, gravestone, monument, or other object designed or intended to mark a gravesite or to memorialize the death of a person;

“tomb” means a mausoleum, columbarium, or crypt, whether that mausoleum, columbarium, or crypt is located above or below ground.

Criminal mischief in the third degree is a class C felony.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 13 ch 102 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1991; am § 11 ch 71 SLA 1996; am §§ 1, 2 ch 83 SLA 2001; am §§ 9 — 11 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 14 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 18 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 10 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 27 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property of another” - AS

11.46.990

(13)

Definition of “oil or gas pipeline or supporting facilities,” “tampers,” “widely dangerous means” - AS

11.46.490

Definition of “propelled vehicle” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts - AS

11.46.980

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Criminal mischief in the first, third and fourth degree - AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.515

; AS

28.35.010

; AS 11.20.145.

TD: IV, 22-23; TD III, 43-45.

For punishment of class C felonies, see AS

12.55.125(e)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For liability for destruction of property by minors, see AS

09.65.255

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(13), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(9), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsections (b) and (c) were enacted as (c) and (d), respectively.
Relettered in 2001, at which time former subsection (b) was relettered as (d).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(1), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” after “amount” and substituted “$1,000” for “$750”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(1), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “in an amount” in (a)(1).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 14, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on Chapter 102, SLA 1980 (HCS CSSB 511), see 1980 Senate Journal Supplement, No. 44, May 29, 1980, or 1980 House Journal Supplement, No. 79, May 29, 1980.

Sec. 11.46.484.
Criminal mischief in the fourth degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal mischief in the fourth degree if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right,

with intent to damage property of another, the person damages property of another in an amount of $250 or more but less than $750;

the person tampers with a fire protection device in a building that is a public place;

the person knowingly accesses a computer, computer system, computer program, computer network, or part of a computer system or network;

the person uses a device to descramble an electronic signal that has been scrambled to prevent unauthorized receipt or viewing of the signal unless the device is used only to descramble signals received directly from a satellite or unless the person owned the device before September 18, 1984; or

the person knowingly removes, relocates, defaces, alters, obscures, shoots at, destroys, or otherwise tampers with an official traffic control device or damages the work on a highway under construction.

Criminal mischief in the fourth degree is a class A misdemeanor.

[Repealed, § 11 ch 71 SLA 1996.]

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 1 ch 18 SLA 1979; am §§ 7, 8 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 79 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 114 SLA 1984; am § 1 ch 15 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 52 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 30 SLA 1996; am §§ 2, 11 ch 71 SLA 1996; am §§ 12, 13 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 15 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 19 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 11 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 28 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “access,” “computer,” “computer network,” “computer program,” “computer system,” “data,” “property of another” - AS

11.46.990

Definition of “propelled vehicle,” “property,” “building,” “public place” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Theft of services - AS

11.46.200(a)(3)

Definitions of “tamper”, “highway”, “official traffic control device”, “traffic control device” - AS

11.46.490

Criminal mischief in the first, second and fourth degree - AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Forfeiture of property upon conviction - AS

11.46.487

Criminal use of a computer - AS

11.46.740

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts - AS

11.46.980

Offenses defined by age or value - AS

11.81.615

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.515

; AS 11.20.550; AS 11.20.580; AS 11.20.590; AS 11.20.145; AS

28.35.010

TD: III 44-45; TD: IV, 23.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For liability for destruction of property by minors, see AS

09.65.255

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(14), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(10), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraph (4) [formerly (6)] of subsection (a) of this section was enacted as paragraph (a)(5).
Renumbered in 1984. Also, minor word changes were made in subsection (a) in 1984.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(1), inserted “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” after “amount”, substituted “$1,000” for “$750”, and made a stylistic change.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(1), substituted “$750” for “$1,000”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “in an amount” in (a)(1).

Editor's notes. —

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 15, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.486.
Criminal mischief in the fifth degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal mischief in the fifth degree if, having no right to do so or any reasonable ground to believe the person has such a right,

with reckless disregard for the risk of harm to or loss of the property or with intent to cause substantial inconvenience to another, the person tampers with property of another;

with intent to damage property of another, the person damages property of another in an amount less than $250; or

the person rides in a propelled vehicle and, with criminal negligence, disregards the fact that it has been stolen or that it is being used in violation of AS

11.46.360

or

11.46.365(a)(1)

.

Criminal mischief in the fifth degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 6 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 3 ch 71 SLA 1996; am § 14 ch 92 SLA 2002; am § 16 ch 83 SLA 2014; am § 20 ch 36 SLA 2016; am § 12 ch 1 4SSLA 2017; am § 29 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Cross references. —

Definition of “property,” “propelled vehicle” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Definition of “intentionally,” “knowingly,” “recklessly” - AS

11.81.900(a)

Definition of “property of another” - AS 11.46.990(b)

Criminal mischief in the first, second and third degree - AS

11.46.480

—

11.46.486

Determination of value; aggregation of amounts - AS 11.81.980

Original Code Provision - AS 11.26.515; AS 11.20.145; AS

28.35.010

.

TD: IV, 23-24.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For liability for destruction of property by minors, see AS

09.65.255

.

For provision relating to the applicability of the 2016 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 185(a)(15), ch. 36, SLA 2016, in the 2016 Temporary and Special Acts.

For provision relating to applicability of the 2017 amendment to subsection (a), see sec. 75(a)(11), ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 12, 2016, in (a)(2), “adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

” after “amount”.

The 2017 amendment, effective November 27, 2017, in (a)(3), substituted “and, with criminal negligence, disregards the fact that it has been stolen” for “knowing it has been stolen”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 9, 2019, deleted “, adjusted for inflation as provided in AS

11.46.982

,” following “in an amount” in (a)(2).

Editor's notes. —

Under § 54, ch. 30, SLA 1996, references to prior convictions in subsection (a), as amended by § 6, ch. 30, SLA 1996 refer to convictions occurring before, on, or after May 16, 1996.

Although the 2014 amendments were to have taken effect July 1, 2014 under Sec. 42, ch. 83, SLA 2014, the Governor did not sign the bill until July 16, 2014, and so the actual effective date of the 2014 amendments was July 17, 2014 under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Under sec. 36(a), ch. 83, SLA 2014, subsection (a) as amended by sec. 16, ch. 83, SLA 2014, applies to offenses occurring on or after July 17, 2014.

Section 142(a),
ch. 4, FSSLA 2019, provides that the 2019 amendment of (a) of this section applies “to offenses committed on or after July 9, 2019.”

Sec. 11.46.487.
Forfeiture of property upon conviction.

Firearms and other personal property, except a motor vehicle, used in aid of a violation of AS

11.46.460

,

11.46.462

, or

11.46.484(a)(5)

may be forfeited to the state upon conviction of the offender for the crime.

History.

(§ 3 ch 52 SLA 1988; am § 15 ch 92 SLA 2002)

Cross references. —

Definitions of “firearm”, “property” - AS

11.81.900

Definition of “motor vehicle” - AS

11.46.490

Disregard of highway obstruction - AS

11.46.460

Unlawful possession of official traffic control device - AS

11.46.462

Criminal mischief in the third degree - AS

11.46.484

For definitions of terms used in this title, see AS

11.81.900

.

Sec. 11.46.488.
Littering.
[Repealed, § 3 ch 149 SLA 1980.
For current law, see AS 46.06.080.]

Sec. 11.46.489.
Community work upon conviction.

A person convicted under AS

11.46.475

—

11.46.486

of an offense involving damage to public or private property shall be required to perform at least 25 hours of community work under AS

12.55.055

.

History.

(§ 13 ch 1 4SSLA 2017)

Cross References. —

For provision relating to applicability of this section, see sec. 75(a)(12),
ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, in the 2017 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective Dates. —

Section 13, ch. 1, 4SSLA 2017, which enacts this section, took effect on November 27, 2017.

Sec. 11.46.490.
Definitions.
[Renumbered as AS 11.46.495.]

Sec. 11.46.495.
Definitions.

In AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.495

, unless the context requires otherwise,

“highway” has the meaning given in AS

19.59.001

;

“motor vehicle” has the meaning given in AS

28.90.990

;

“official traffic control device” means a traffic control device that has been placed on a highway by authority of a state or municipal agency, a utility, or a contractor employed by a state or municipal agency or a utility;

“oil or gas pipeline or supporting facility ” means real property or tangible personal property used in the exploration for, production or refining of, or pipeline transportation of oil, gas, or gas liquids, except for property used solely in the retail distribution of oil or gas;

“tamper” means to interfere with something improperly, meddle with it, or make unwarranted alterations to its existing condition;

“traffic control device” includes a sign, signal, road marker, barricade, flare, warning light, reflector, railroad sign or signal, shield, insignia, milepost, or similar device intended to warn, inform, or control the flow of pedestrian, equestrian, bicycle, or motor vehicle traffic;

“utility” means an enterprise, whether publicly or privately owned or operated, which provides gas, electric, steam, water, sewer, or communications service, and any common carrier;

“widely dangerous means” means any difficult-to-confine substance, force, or other means capable of causing widespread damage, including fire, explosion, avalanche, poison, radioactive material, bacteria, collapse of a building, or flood.

History.

(§ 4 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 4 ch 52 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 9 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1988 to alphabetize the defined terms. Formerly AS

11.46.490

; renumbered in 2002. In 2006, in (2) of this section, “ AS

28.90.990

” was substituted for “ AS

28.40.100

” to reflect the 2006 renumbering of
AS

28.40.100

. In 2008, in paragraph (1), “ AS

19.59.001

” was substituted for “ AS

19.45.001

” to reflect the 2008 renumbering of
AS

19.45.001

.

Cross references. —

For definition of terms used in this chapter, see AS

11.46.990

.